Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-508
Redevelopment project valuation; county assessor; duties.

Commencing on the effective date of the project agreement, the county assessor, or county clerk if he or she is ex officio county assessor, of the county or counties in which the redevelopment project is located, shall transmit to the contracting public body and to the county treasurer, upon request, the redevelopment project valuation and shall annually certify to such contracting public body and the county treasurer the current valuation for assessment of taxable real property and personal property in the redevelopment project. The county assessor shall undertake, upon request of such contracting public body, an investigation, examination, and inspection of the taxable real property and taxable personal property in the redevelopment project and shall reaffirm or revalue the current value for assessment for such property in accordance with the findings of such investigation, examination, and inspection.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 8.